Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2116.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; Colorado River litigation fund The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Colorado River litigation fund established by section 45-119, Arizona Revised Statutes.